California, session 20252026, SB969.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12107.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:12107.2. On or before July 1, 2028, the secretary shall, in consultation with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, update the regulations regarding electric vehicle fueling systems to conform to the requirements of Sections 12210.1 and 12210.2.SEC. 2. Section 12210.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:12210.1.(a)A sealer may only inspect an EVSE in accordance with the following:(1)AC EVSE installed on or after January 1, 2021.(2)DC EVSE installed on or after January 1, 2023.(3)All AC EVSEs, regardless of the date of installation, beginning January 1, 2031.(4)All DC EVSEs, regardless of the date of installation, beginning January 1, 2033.(b)(1)A sealer shall not inspect an EVSE more frequently than once every three years.12210.1. (a) (1) (A) The secretary shall adopt regulations governing the inspection frequency of EVSE that authorize both of the following:(i) An inspection frequency that is a risk-based statistical sampling of EVSE.(ii) The inspection frequency otherwise required for EVSE under regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12212, as those regulations may be amended from time to time.(B) A county sealer shall choose to inspect EVSE at either of the frequencies described in subparagraph (A).(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a sealer may inspect an EVSE at any time in response to a consumer complaint.(3) This subdivision does not prevent a sealer from testing a device in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 12212.(c)(b) A sealer shall inspect an EVSE in accordance with all of the following requirements:(1) The sealer shall seal an EVSE meeting all applicable requirements of this division and any regulations adopted pursuant to this division.(2) If a sealer determines that an EVSE model is not type approved or accurate, or individual device does not meet type approval or applicable tolerance requirements, the sealer shall take the EVSE out of service and shall, within 48 hours of taking that EVSE out of service, shall report that determination to the Division of Measurement Standards with an explanation for why it took the EVSE out of service. service in its monthly report pursuant to subdivision (c).(3) If a sealer determines that an EVSE does not meet any other applicable requirement of this division, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this division, the sealer shall do the following:(A) Submit a written notice to the owner or operator of the EVSE to inform the owner or operator of the deficiency.(B) Take the EVSE out of service by marking the EVSE with a tag or other suitable device with the words “out of order” only if both of the following conditions are satisfied:(i) The sealer does not receive an acknowledgment of the notice submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) from the owner or operator within 30 days of the submittal.(ii) The owner or operator does not fix the deficiency to the sealer’s satisfaction within 90 45 days of the submittal of the notice pursuant to subparagraph (A). (A), unless the sealer grants additional time to fix the deficiency.(d)No less than annually, a sealer shall submit EVSE inspection data and information to the Division of Measurement Standards and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, including, but not limited to, the number of registered EVSEs, the number of inspected EVSEs, the number of sealed EVSEs, the number of violations, the number of violations related to type approval, the number of violations related to accuracy, and the number of violations resulting from an EVSE found to be incorrect.(c) A sealer shall submit EVSE inspection data and information on a monthly basis, as prescribed by the secretary, to the Division of Measurement Standards, including, but not limited to, the reason an EVSE was taken out of service pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(d) No less than biannually, the Division of Measurement Standards shall provide the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission with the information and data submitted pursuant to subdivision (c).(e) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Commercial purposes” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12500.(2) “EVSE” means an electric vehicle fueling system used for commercial purposes.(3)“Incorrect” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12500.SEC. 3. Section 12210.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:12210.2.(a)All AC EVSEs, regardless of the date of installation, shall comply with Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Division 9 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations by January 1, 2031, and all DC EVSEs, regardless of the date of installation, shall comply with Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Division 9 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations by January 1, 2033.(b)12210.2. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 12532, type-approved EVSEs, without field-adjustable meters, EVSE meeting type approval requirements that are factory tested and certified for metrological requirements by a factory registered service agency are exempt from both of the following:(1) Having to be placed in service in the field by a registered service agency or sealer.(2) Having to be tested for accuracy meeting applicable tolerance requirements in the field when placed in service.(c)(b) (1) The owner, operator, or installer their designee, of an EVSE described in subdivision (b) (a) shall register the installation of the EVSE with the county sealer and submit by submitting a placed in service report to the county sealer. sealer within 72 hours of installation.(2) A sealer shall not require an accuracy test to be performed, or the use of a registered service agency, for a placed in service report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).(c) (1) A repair of an EVSE described in subdivision (a) that is a metrologically relevant repair shall only be performed by a service agency or service agent.(d)(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 12531), a registered service agency shall perform a metrologically relevant repair of an EVSE described in subdivision (b), and all other repairs may be performed by other entities. repair of an EVSE described in subdivision (a) that is not a metrologically relevant repair may be performed by any person competent to perform the repair provided that the person, or their designee, provide notice of the repair in writing to the sealer within one week of performing the repair.(e)(d) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Commercial purposes” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12500.(1)(2) “EVSE” means an electric vehicle fueling system used for commercial purposes.(3) “Factory registered service agency” means a service agency that conducts testing in a factory or facility before installation.(2)(4) “Factory tested and certified” means a process by which a manufacturer demonstrates that its production process consistently produces and validates instruments conforming to the approved type.(3)(5) “Metrologically relevant repair” means a repair affecting the meter and its accuracy. or a device’s compliance with applicable tolerance requirements.(4)(6) “Placed in service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12531.(5)(7) “Repair” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12531.(6)(8) “Service agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12531.(9) “Service agent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12531.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.